Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.253

Students practicing pharmacy—Rules.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) This chapter does not prohibit a student from practicing pharmacy if:

(a) The student is enrolled in a college or school of pharmacy accredited by the commission and is registered as a pharmacy intern under RCW 18.64.080;

(b) The student performs services without compensation or the expectation of compensation as part of a volunteer activity;

(c) The student is under the direct supervision of a pharmacist licensed under this chapter, a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, or a registered nurse or *advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;

(d) The services the student performs are within the scope of practice of: (i) A pharmacist licensed under this chapter; and (ii) the person supervising the student;

(e) The college or school in which the student is enrolled verifies that the student has demonstrated competency through his or her education and training to perform the services; and

(f) The student provides proof of current malpractice insurance to the volunteer activity organizer prior to performing any services.

(2) The commission may adopt rules to implement the requirements of this section.

[2019 c 270 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.